West Virginia, session 2026, SB483.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 15. THE WEST VIRGINIA OFFICIALS TRAINING PROGRAM ACT §6-15-1. Short Title. This article shall be known and may be cited as the "West Virginia Officials Training Program Act." §6-15-2. Legislative Findings and Purpose. (a) The Legislature finds that county governments, municipalities, boards, commissions, authorities, and county boards of education in West Virginia are exercising broader authority and facing increased responsibilities in fiscal oversight, regulatory compliance, infrastructure planning, emergency response, economic development, education oversight, and long-range governance.(b) The Legislature further finds that many appointed, special-purpose, or quasi-independent public bodies — including public service districts, planning commissions, building commissions, parks and recreation boards, development authorities, and similar entities — exercise significant public power, manage public funds, and are subject to open government, ethics, and procurement laws, yet have historically received little or no structured training tailored to their statutory duties.(c) The Legislature recognizes that the complexity of modern public administration makes it unreasonable and impractical to appoint individuals to public office or to boards, commissions, or authorities and expect them to independently acquire, without guidance or support, the knowledge necessary to fulfill their legal, fiduciary, and operational responsibilities.(d) The Legislature therefore finds that effective governance requires more than appointment alone, and that public officials and board members should be provided with structured, role-appropriate training designed to prepare them for the specific responsibilities of the office or board on which they serve.(e) The Legislature further finds that West Virginia’s institutions of higher education possess substantial expertise in public administration, leadership, finance, law, workforce development, and organizational management, and are valuable partners in the design and delivery of effective public-official training.(f) The Legislature finds that a unified, statewide framework for training and professional development promotes consistency, accountability, transparency, reduced legal and financial risk, and increased public confidence in government.(g) The Legislature declares its intent to establish within the Office of the State Auditor a comprehensive, modern, and nationally replicable system of local-official and board-member training and leadership development, positioning West Virginia as a leader in strengthening local governance capacity.(h) The purpose of this article is to create a statewide program that provides foundational, advanced, and role-specific training for local public officials and board members; supports continuous professional development; strengthens governance outcomes; and equips public servants to competently perform the duties entrusted to them. §6-15-3. Establishment of the Program; Administration by the State Auditor. (a) There is hereby created within the Office of the State Auditor the West Virginia Officials Training Program ("the Program").(b) The State Auditor shall administer, oversee, and maintain the Program and shall serve as the principal authority for:(1) Curriculum development and approval;(2) Training delivery and coordination;(3) Certification and continuing-education standards;(4) Performance measurement and reporting; and(5) Program administration and rulemaking.(c) A Local Governance & Training Division is hereby created within the Office of the State Auditor. The Auditor may employ staff, engage contractors, and utilize existing resources as necessary to implement this article.(d) The State Auditor may coordinate with state agencies, institutions of higher education, and other entities, including for curriculum design, instructional development, research support, and program evaluation; however, final authority over Program content, certification standards, and administration shall remain with the State Auditor.(e) The State Auditor may convene advisory working groups consisting of representatives from institutions of higher education, state agencies, and experienced public officials to assist in curriculum development and program evaluation. Such groups are advisory only and do not exercise decision-making authority. §6-15-4. Applicability. (a) The Program shall be available to:(1) County commissioners and other county elected officials;(2) Municipal mayors, recorders or clerks, and members of municipal governing bodies;(3) Members of county or municipal boards, commissions, and authorities, including appointed, special-purpose, or quasi-independent boards exercising public authority, such as public service districts, planning commissions, building commissions, parks and recreation boards, development authorities, and similar entities;(4) Members of county boards of education through a dedicated Education Leadership Track;(5) Appointed officials or administrators with responsibility for public funds, procurement, or compliance; and(6) Any additional public officials designated by the State Auditor.(b) Participation is voluntary unless otherwise required by law; however, participation is strongly encouraged as a matter of sound governance and public stewardship. §6-15-5. Tiered Certification System. (a) The Program shall establish a tiered certification structure consisting of:(1) Level I – Foundations of Local Governance;(2) Level II – Governance, Management, and Public Administration;(3) Level III – Strategic and Long-Range Leadership; and(4) Education Leadership Track for members of county boards of education.(b) The State Auditor shall issue certificates of completion and maintain a centralized statewide registry of certified officials.(c) The State Auditor may establish continuing-education requirements, equivalencies, renewal standards, and credit hours by rule. §6-15-6. Required Curriculum; Program Components. (a) The curriculum shall include, at a minimum:(1) Open Meetings Act and Freedom of Information Act compliance;(2) Ethics, conflicts of interest, and standards of conduct;(3) Budgeting, fiscal oversight, and audit preparation;(4) Purchasing and procurement law;(5) Personnel and human-resources fundamentals;(6) Risk management and liability mitigation;(7) Capital planning and infrastructure management;(8) Economic development, site readiness, and community planning;(9) Intergovernmental and regional cooperation;(10) Crisis communication and emergency preparedness;(11) Strategic planning aligned with statewide economic and educational priorities;(12) Education finance, accountability, and workforce alignment for the Education Leadership Track; and(13) Additional subject areas identified by the State Auditor.(b) Curriculum shall be periodically updated to reflect changes in law, best practices, and statewide needs.(c) Training shall be designed to reflect the distinct legal, fiduciary, and operational responsibilities associated with different offices, boards, commissions, and authorities, and the State Auditor may establish board- or authority-specific training modules tailored to particular classes of public bodies. §6-15-7. Leadership Development Initiatives. (a) In addition to certification, the Program may include:(1) Advanced leadership institutes;(2) Mentorship or fellowship programs;(3) Regional leadership cohorts;(4) Multi-jurisdictional workshops addressing complex governance challenges; and(5) Partnerships with institutions of higher education or professional organizations for advanced instruction. §6-15-8. Delivery of Training. (a) Training may be delivered through:(1) Regional in-person academies;(2) Online or remote-learning platforms;(3) Statewide conferences or summits;(4) Recorded or on-demand coursework; and(5) Any other method approved by the State Auditor to ensure accessibility and effectiveness. §6-15-9. Statewide Local Governance Performance Dashboard. (a) The State Auditor shall maintain a Statewide Local Governance Performance Dashboard tracking:(1) Training participation and certification rates;(2) Continuing-education compliance trends;(3) Aggregate governance and training needs identified through the Program;(4) Regional or statewide trends affecting local governance; and(5) Other performance indicators identified by the Auditor.(b) Data may be aggregated or anonymized as appropriate and shall be updated at least annually. §6-15-10. National Cooperation and Reciprocity. (a) The State Auditor may enter into cooperative agreements with other states, national associations, or regional organizations for shared curriculum development, reciprocal certification recognition, or joint leadership initiatives.(b) The State Auditor shall ensure the Program remains suitable for adoption or adaptation by other states seeking to improve local governance capacity. §6-15-11. Funding; Cost Recovery; Organizational Participation Fees. (a) The Program may be funded through legislative appropriations, grants, federal funds, partnerships, organizational participation fees, or other lawful sources.(b) Foundational training required for Level I certification shall be provided at no cost to individual officials.(c) The State Auditor is authorized to establish, by rule, a reasonable organizational participation fee assessed to counties, municipalities, boards, commissions, authorities, or other public entities whose officials participate in the Program.(d) Organizational participation fees:(1) Shall be assessed to the governmental entity, not to individual officials;(2) May be tiered based on population, budget size, or entity classification;(3) Shall be capped to avoid undue burden on small or rural entities; and(4) Shall be used solely for Program administration, curriculum development, and training delivery.(e) The State Auditor may charge additional fees for optional or advanced leadership-level coursework. §6-15-12. Required Cooperation by State Agencies. (a) All state agencies, boards, commissions, and offices with subject-matter jurisdiction relevant to local governance shall cooperate with the State Auditor in the development and delivery of training under this article.(b) Upon request, cooperating agencies shall, to the extent practicable:(1) Provide subject-matter expertise;(2) Assist in curriculum design or updates;(3) Make available instructional materials or trainers;(4) Designate a liaison for coordination; and(5) Align existing agency training where feasible.(c) Cooperation under this section does not confer approval authority or administrative control over the Program.(d) The State Auditor retains final authority over all Program elements.(e) Nothing in this section requires an agency to expend funds beyond existing appropriations unless otherwise authorized by the Legislature. §6-15-13. Annual Report. (a) The State Auditor shall submit an annual report to the Joint Committee on Government and Finance summarizing Program participation, certification outcomes, continuing-education trends, aggregate governance needs, expenditures, funding sources, and recommendations for improving training effectiveness.(b) The State Auditor shall also provide the report, or an executive summary thereof, to participating state agencies, counties, municipalities, boards, commissions, authorities, and other entities whose officials are eligible for or participate in the Program.(c) Reports distributed under this section shall be informational in nature, may present data in aggregated or anonymized form, and shall not be used for enforcement, disciplinary action, or adverse administrative determinations.(d) The purpose of the report is to promote transparency, continuous improvement, shared understanding of governance challenges, and informed collaboration among state and local entities. §6-15-14. Rulemaking. The State Auditor may propose legislative rules and promulgate emergency rules pursuant to §29A-3-1 et seq. of this code to implement this article. §6-15-15. Transition of Duties. All local-official training responsibilities previously exercised by other state entities are transferred to the State Auditor unless prohibited by federal law.